Utah statutes.
59-5-108.   Tax as lien on property or oil and gas production interests.

(1)  The severance tax imposed by this chapter, together with penalties and interest, is and shall remain a lien upon the owner's interest in the oil or gas well or rights in the well from which the oil or gas is extracted, until the tax is paid.

(2)  In the case of an owner who has no interest in the oil or gas well, but only in the proceeds of production from it, the lien is upon the oil or gas production rights or royalty interests in the well.



Amended by Chapter 4, 1988 General Session

